North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116D. Higher Education Bonds.
Article 4. Community Colleges Facilities General Obligation Finance Act.

§ 116D-41.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the Community College Facilities General Obligation Finance Act.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

Editor’s Note.

As to the interpretation and implementation of the Michael K. Hooker Higher Education Facilities Financing Act, Session Laws 2000-3, see the Editor’s Note under

G.S. 116D-1

.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(a), provides that the proceeds of community college general obligation bonds and notes, including any premium thereon, except the proceeds of community college general obligation bonds the issuance of which has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the proceeds of refunding bonds or notes, are to be allocated and expended for paying the cost of community college capital facilities, to the extent and as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 116D of the General Statutes, as enacted by the act and subject to change as provided in the act, and sets out a schedule of allocations for new construction and repair and renovations for each community college, campus, and center.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(b) as amended by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 30.9, provides:
“Except as provided in this subsection, a community college may use the bond proceeds allocated in subsection (a) of this section for repair and renovation only in accordance with the repair and renovation formula adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges in May 1998, as supplemented by additional repair and renovation needs determined by the State Board of Community Colleges as of April 2000. The following provisions govern reallocations:

“(1) New Construction. — Except as provided in this paragraph, new construction funds allocated in this section to a specific site may not be allocated to another site. If the local board of trustees of a community college determines that new construction funds allocated to a specific site are not needed at that site, the board may request that the State Board of Community Colleges reallocate those funds for new construction at another site of the community college. Except in the case of Mayland Community College and Vance-Granville Community College, the funds may not be reallocated from a site outside the main campus county to a site within the main campus county. If the State Board of Community Colleges determines that the funds are not needed for new construction at the site for which they were originally allocated, it shall approve the reallocation to the other site and shall substitute the proposed facility at the other site in the Community Colleges System Office’s application to the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 116D-43

.

“Each community college shall submit to the State Board of Community Colleges a statement (i) proposing the capital facilities to be financed with the proceeds of community college general obligation bonds allocated to that community college, (ii) certifying that the proposed site is included in the allocations in this section or is a substitute facility at another site because the funds are not needed for new construction at the site for which they are allocated in this section, (iii) certifying that the community college is prepared to proceed with the construction, acquisition, or improvement of the proposed capital facilities, and (iv) demonstrating that the applicable matching requirements have been or will be met.

“Upon receipt by the State Board of Community Colleges of the information set forth above, the Board shall add the proposed capital facilities to the next application of the Community Colleges System Office to the State Treasurer to issue bonds pursuant to

G.S. 116D-43

.

“The board of trustees of an individual community college may use funds allocated for new construction either for new construction or for repair and renovations.

“(2) Repair and Renovations. — The board of trustees of a community college may use funds allocated for repair and renovations only for repair and renovations, and not for new construction. Funds allocated for repair and renovations shall be directed by the local board of trustees of a community college among the State Board approved sites of the community college on the basis of need, subject to approval by the State Board of Community Colleges.

“(3) Reallocation by General Assembly. — The projected allocations set forth above may be changed from time to time as the General Assembly may decide.”

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(c), provides:
“The match requirements of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes apply to bond proceeds allocated in this section for new construction except as provided in this subsection. The consultant hired by the State Board of Community Colleges to determine funding formulas for the community college system developed an index to measure each county’s ability to pay. The consultant found that some counties are unable to meet their local match requirement under Chapter 115D of the General Statutes because of inability to pay. The consultant recommended applying the ‘ability to pay’ index to generate an adjusted matching rate. Accordingly, community colleges are required to match bond proceeds allocated for new construction in this section only as follows: Community colleges assigned an adjusted matching rate of less than forty percent (40%) in the ability to pay portion of the formula adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges in March 2000 are not required to match, and community colleges assigned an adjusted matching rate of forty percent (40%) or more in the ability to pay portion of the formula are required to match only at the assigned rate.”

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(d), as amended by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 8.8, provides:
“If the State Board of Community Colleges determines that a community college has not met its matching requirements by July 1, 2007, with respect to a capital improvement project for which bond proceeds are allocated in this act, the Board shall certify that fact to the State Treasurer by October 1, 2007.
All of these bond proceeds with respect to which the Board certifies that the matching requirement has not been met by July 1, 2007, shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special account within the Community Colleges Bond Fund and shall be used for making grants to community colleges. Bond proceeds in the special account shall be allocated among the community colleges in accordance with the following conditions:

“(1) The State Board of Community Colleges shall generate, by October 1, 2007, a priority ranking of legitimate community college capital improvement needs using a formula based on objective meaningful factors relevant to capital needs, including actual and projected enrollment, space requirements, current capacity, construction costs, and any other factors the State Board considers relevant.

“(2) The State Board of Community Colleges shall provide the State Treasurer a projected allocation of the proceeds in the special account in accordance with this priority ranking, except that:

“a. No projected allocation shall be made for a community college that the Board certified in accordance with this subsection had failed to meet a matching requirement.

“b. No more than four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be allocated to a single community college.

“c. Funds shall not be allocated for more than one project per community college.

“(3) The proceeds of grants made from bond proceeds in the special account shall be allocated and expended for paying the cost of community college capital improvements in accordance with this allocation by the State Board of Community Colleges, to the extent and as provided in this act. The Director of the Budget is empowered, when the Director of the Budget determines it is in the best interest of the State and the North Carolina Community College System to do so, and if the cost of a particular project is less than the projected allocation, to use the excess funds to increase the size of that project or increase the size of any other project itemized in this section, or to increase the amount allocated to a particular community college within the aggregate amount of funds available under this section. The Director of the Budget shall consult with the Advisory Budget Commission and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations before making these changes.”

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(e), designates the North Carolina Center for Applied Technology as a community college with a matching rate of less than forty percent (40%), for the purposes of the act.

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(f), provides that, notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341(3)

a.2.,

G.S. 143-341(3)

applies only to funds provided by this act for construction or renovation of community college buildings requiring an estimated expenditure of more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

Session Laws 2000-3, s. 3(g), provides that the validity of community college general obligation bonds and notes issued under Article 4 of Chapter 116D of the General Statutes, as enacted by the act, is not affected by any subsequent adjustment of allocations or matching requirements provided in the act, or by any failure to comply with matching requirements or reporting requirements provided in the act.

§ 116D-42.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Bonds. — Bonds authorized to be issued under this Article, including refunding bonds.

Community college. — Defined in

G.S. 115D-2

.

Community college general obligation bonds. — Bonds authorized to be issued under this Article, including refunding bonds.

Community Colleges System Office. — The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office, created by Article 1 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes, or if the Community Colleges System Office is abolished or otherwise divested of its functions under this Article, the public body succeeding it in its principal functions, or upon which are conferred by law the rights, powers, and duties given by this Article to the Community Colleges System Office.

Notes. — Notes issued under this Article.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-43.
Authorization of bonds and notes.

Subject to a favorable vote of a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question of issuing community college general obligation bonds in the election held as provided by law, and upon the application of the Community Colleges System Office, the State Treasurer may, by and with the consent of the Council of State, issue and sell, at one time or from time to time, community college general obligation bonds of the State to be designated “State of North Carolina Community College General Obligation Bonds”, with any additional designations as may be determined to indicate the issuance of bonds from time to time, or notes of the State. Except as otherwise provided by this Article, the aggregate amount of bonds and notes issued pursuant to this Article shall not exceed six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000). The bonds and notes shall be issued in the following years up to the following amounts:

Fiscal Year Aggregate Amount 2000-2001 $ 48,400,000 2001-2002 58,100,000 2002-2003 116,100,000 2003-2004 116,100,000 2004-2005 135,500,000 2005-2006 125,800,000

Click to view

If less than the aggregate amount of bonds or notes authorized to be issued in a fiscal year is issued in that fiscal year, the balance for that fiscal year may be issued in any subsequent fiscal year. Refunding bonds and notes issued pursuant to

G.S. 116D-46(f)

shall not be included in the limitation on the aggregate amount of bonds and notes that may be issued pursuant to this Article.

The proceeds of bonds or notes issued under this Article shall be applied to finance the cost of grants to be made by the State to community colleges to finance the cost of capital facilities for the community college or to refund any outstanding bonds or notes issued under this Article. The capital facilities to be improved, constructed, or acquired with the proceeds of bonds or notes shall be determined as provided in

G.S. 116D-44

.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

Editor’s Note.

As to the purpose and interpretation of the Michael K. Hooker Higher Education Facilities Financing Act, Session Laws 2000-3, see the Editor’s Note under

G.S. 116D-1

.

§ 116D-44.
Designation of capital facilities and preconditions to bond issuance.

The capital facilities to be financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of community college general obligation bonds shall be described in legislation enacted from time to time by the General Assembly. This legislation shall also provide for voter approval of the bonds to finance the capital facilities and shall become effective only upon approval by the voters. The proceeds of community college general obligation bonds shall not be expended to pay the costs of any capital facilities other than those described in that legislation.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-45.
Faith and credit.

The faith and credit and taxing power of the State are hereby pledged for the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes. The State retains the right to amend any provision of this Article to the extent it does not impair any contractual right of a bond owner.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-46.
Issuance of bonds and notes.

Terms and Conditions. — Bonds or notes may bear any dates, may be serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination of these, may mature in any amounts and at any times, not exceeding 25 years from their dates, may be payable at any places, either within or without the United States, in any coin or currency of the United States that at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts, may bear interest at any rates, which may vary from time to time, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at any prices, including a price greater than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under any terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer, by and with the consent of the Council of State.

Signatures; Form and Denomination; Registration. — Bonds or notes may be issued in certificated or uncertificated form. If issued in certificated form, bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the Governor or shall bear the Governor’s facsimile signature, shall be signed by the State Treasurer or shall bear the State Treasurer’s facsimile signature, and shall bear the Great Seal of the State or a facsimile of the Seal impressed or imprinted on them. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile signatures of the Governor and the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall also bear a manual signature which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee, paying agent, or designated assistant of the State Treasurer. The form and denomination of bonds or notes, including the provisions with respect to registration of the bonds or notes and any system for their registration, shall be as the State Treasurer may determine in conformity with this Article.

Manner of Sale; Expenses. — Subject to the approval by the Council of State as to the manner in which bonds or notes shall be offered for sale, whether at public or private sale, whether within or without the United States, and whether by publishing notices in certain newspapers and financial journals, mailing notices, inviting bids by correspondence, negotiating contracts of purchase or otherwise, the State Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes at one time or from time to time at any rates of interest, which may vary from time to time, and at any prices, including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All expenses incurred in the preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other available moneys.

Application of Proceeds. — The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which the bonds or notes were issued and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions, if any, that the Council of State may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or in any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes.Any additional moneys which may be received by means of a grant or grants from the United States or any agency or department thereof or from any other source to aid in financing the cost of a capital facility may be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without regard to any limitations imposed by this Article.

Notes; Repayment. — By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of the State for the same, but only in the following circumstances and under the following conditions:

For anticipating the sale of bonds the issuance of which the Council of State has approved, if the State Treasurer considers it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds.

For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal of any bonds then outstanding, if there are not sufficient funds in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or installment or principal as they respectively become due.

For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes authorized in this Article.

For the purposes authorized in this Article.

For refunding bonds or notes as authorized in this Article.Funds derived from the sale of bonds or notes may be used in the payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this Article. Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.

Refunding Bonds and Notes. — By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes for the purpose of refunding bonds or notes issued pursuant to this Article and to pay the cost of issuance of the refunding bonds or notes. The refunding bonds and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes similarly secured. Refunding bonds or notes may be issued at any time prior to the final maturity of the debt or obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds or notes shall be applied to the immediate payment and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded or, if not required for the immediate payment of the bonds or notes being refunded, the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding. Money in a trust fund may be invested in (i) direct obligations of the United States government, (ii) obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, (iii) obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government if the timely payment of principal and interest on the obligations is unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government, or (iv) certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State if the certificates are secured by a pledge of any of the obligations described in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. This section does not limit the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of bonds or notes being refunded but that have not matured and are not presently redeemable, or if presently redeemable, have not been called for redemption.

Community College Bonds Fund. — The proceeds of community college general obligation bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, except the proceeds of bonds the issuance of which has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the proceeds of refunding bonds or notes, shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special fund to be designated “Community College Bonds Fund”. Moneys in the Community College Bonds Fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in this Article.Any additional moneys that may be received by means of a grant or grants from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or from any other source to aid in financing the cost of any community college capital facilities authorized by this Article may be placed by the State Treasurer in the Community College Bonds Fund or in a separate account or fund and shall be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without regard to any limitations imposed by this Article.The proceeds of community college general obligation bonds and notes may be used with any other moneys made available by the General Assembly for the making of grants to community colleges for capital facilities, including the proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether previously made available or which may be made available after the effective date of this Article. The proceeds of community college bonds and notes shall be expended and disbursed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Budget. The funds provided by this Article for grants to community colleges shall be disbursed for the purposes provided in this Article upon warrants drawn on the State Treasurer by the State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn until requisition has been approved by the Director of the Budget and which requisition shall be approved only after full compliance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2; 2001-414, s. 46; 2006-203, s. 57.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 57, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter,
substituted “the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes” for “the Executive Budget Act, Article 1 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes” at the end of subsection (g).

§ 116D-47.
Variable rate demand bonds and notes.

In fixing the details of bonds and notes, the State Treasurer may provide that the bonds and notes may:

Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner, if a credit facility supports the bonds or notes, unless the State Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility is not required upon a finding and determination by the State Treasurer that the absence of a credit facility will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State.

Be additionally supported by a credit facility.

Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to maturity.

Bear interest at rates that may vary from any periods of time, as may be provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds or notes, including, without limitation, any variations as may be permitted pursuant to a par formula.

Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made to remarket bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for payment to the provider of the credit facility or to the State.

If the aggregate principal amount payable by the State under a credit facility is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the credit facility, whether as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility of a provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption premium, or for any other reason, then the amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes during the term of the credit facility shall not be less than the amount of the excess, unless the payment of the excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the State executed by the State Treasurer.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-48.
Other agreements.

The State Treasurer may authorize, execute, obtain, or otherwise provide for bond insurance, investment contracts, credit and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements and other derivative products, and any other related instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines are desirable in connection with the issuance of bonds or notes. The State Treasurer is authorized to employ and designate any financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be associated with any bond issue under this Article as the State Treasurer considers necessary.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-49.
Procurement of capital facilities.

Any laws, rules, or regulations of the State that relate to the acquisition and construction of capital facilities shall apply to the capital facilities financed pursuant to this Article.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§§ 116D-50 through 116D-54.

Reserved for future codification purposes.